Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-558
City, village, and school elections; ballots; results; certificates of nomination or election.

City, village, and school district ballots shall be prepared for each city, village, or school election. The election commissioner, county clerk, or city or village clerk may certify and deliver all ballots, including ballots for early voting, across county lines to the election commissioner, county clerk, or city or village clerk in the adjoining county. The election commissioner, county clerk, or city or village clerk shall certify the results and shall issue certificates of nomination or election to the successful candidates.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 154;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 5.